Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.630

Motor vehicle transportation service—Use of personal motor vehicle.

RCW 43.19.560 through 43.19.620, * 43.41.130, and * 43.41.140 shall not be construed to prohibit a state officer or employee from using his or her personal motor vehicle on state business and being reimbursed therefor, where permitted under state travel policies, rules, and regulations promulgated by the office of financial management, and where such use is in the interest of economic, efficient, and effective management and performance of official state business.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5070; 1989 c 57 s 8; 1979 c 151 s 104; 1975 1st ex.s. c 167 s 16.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.41.130 and 43.41.140 were recodified as RCW 43.19.622 and 43.19.623, respectively, pursuant to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 325.

Effective date—1989 c 57: See note following RCW 43.19.620.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 167: See note following RCW 43.19.560.